South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 116, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-116-45. Any additional compensation received during a fiscal year by a campus police officer who is also employed to work special events during the same fiscal year is exempt from any provision of law or regulation that limits the maximum compensation he is authorized to receive during a fiscal year for dual employment as a campus police officer. "Special events" include, but are not limited to, events that involve guest speakers, athletic events, parades and any events that occur at a location owned by the college or university. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----